Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1913.03
Immunization; department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations relating to the required levels of protection, using as a guide the recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics and the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Public Health Service, and the methods, manner, and frequency of reporting of each child's immunization status. The department shall furnish each program with copies of such rules and regulations and any other material which will assist in carrying out section 71-1913.01.

Laws 1987, LB 472, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 431, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 401, § 37;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 592;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 105;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 40;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 502.